Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2004
Missing person; notification.

Upon notification to a local law enforcement agency of the disappearance of a missing person, such agency shall immediately notify the patrol which shall notify the school in which such missing person is enrolled and the department. The department shall notify the county agency if such missing person was born in such county. Any information known to the patrol shall be supplied to the department.

Laws 1987, LB 599, § 4;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 84.